Hawaii statutes.
§11-338 Late contributions; late
expenditures; report. (a) The candidate, authorized person in the case of
a noncandidate committee that is a party, or treasurer in the case of a
candidate committee or other noncandidate committee, that, within the period of
fourteen calendar days through four calendar days prior to any election, makes
contributions aggregating more than $500, or receives contributions from any
person aggregating more than $500, shall file a late contribution report by
means of the commission's electronic filing system on or before the third
calendar day prior to the election.

(b) The late contribution report shall include
the following information:

(1) Name, address, occupation, and employer of the
contributor;

(2) Name of the candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee making or receiving the contribution; provided that, for
noncandidate committees making only independent expenditures, if a late
contribution greater than $5,000 in the aggregate is received from an entity
other than an individual, for-profit business entity, or labor union, then the
report shall include:

(A) The internet address where the
contributing entity's disclosure report can be publicly accessed, if the
contributing entity is subject to any state or federal disclosure reporting
requirements regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds;

(B) The name, address, occupation, and
employer of each funding source of more than $100 in the aggregate to that
contributing entity; or

(C) An acknowledgment that the contributing
entity is not subject to any state or federal disclosure reporting requirements
regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds;

(3) The amount of the contribution received;

(4) The amount of the contribution made;

(5) The contributor's aggregate contributions to the
candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee; and

(6) The purpose, if any, to which the contribution
will be applied, including, for contributions to a noncandidate committee, the
name of any candidate supported, opposed, or clearly identified.

(c) A noncandidate committee that makes
independent expenditures in an aggregate amount of more than $500 within the
period between fourteen and four calendar days prior to any election shall file
a late expenditure report by means of the commission's electronic filing system
on or before the third calendar day prior to the election. The late
expenditure report shall include the following information for each
expenditure:

(1) The amount and date made;

(2) The vendor name, address, and contact
information; and

(3) The purpose, including the name of any candidate
supported, opposed, or clearly identified by the expenditure.

(d) A late contribution report or late
expenditure report filed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any
other report required to be filed by this part. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L
2013, c 112, §7; am L 2015, c 209, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next